Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-147
Disciplinary action; board; legal representation.

At all hearings, the Attorney General of this state, or one of his assistants designated by him, or such other legal counsel as may be employed, shall appear and represent the board.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 42, p. 69.